Florida, session 2026, HB977.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) is added to section 110.12303,
Florida Statutes, to read:
110.12303 State group insurance program; additional
benefits; price transparency program; reporting.—
(9)(a) For state group health insurance plan policies
issued on or after January 1, 2027, the department shall provide
coverage for evidence-based treatment and management of obesity
and related conditions, as prescribed by a professional health
care provider, for:
1. Intensive health behavioral and lifestyle treatment.
2. United States Food and Drug Administration-approved
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb977-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 977 2026
weight management medications.
(b) Coverage criteria for a United States Food and Drug
Administration-approved weight management medication may not be
more restrictive than the United States Food and Drug
Administration indications for such medication. Coverage for
intensive health behavioral and lifestyle treatment may include
interventions certified by or recognized by the United States
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or recommended by
current clinical standards of care. Services may be provided in
person, virtually, or in community-based settings to support
patient access and needs.
(c) Before January 1, 2027, the department shall adopt
eligibility criteria, which shall require patients to:
1. Be enrolled in a PPO or HMO plans.
2. Be 18 years of age or older.
3. Be referred and supervised by an in-network licensed
provider.
4. Consent to provide personal and medical information to
the department, including medical records documenting body mass
index and weight related comorbidities.
5. Have received a clinical diagnosis of obesity by an in-
network licensed provider.
6. Participate in intensive health, behavioral, and
lifestyle intervention.
(d) As used in this subsection, the term:
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb977-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 977 2026
1. "United States Food and Drug Administration-approved
weight management medication" means any Glucagon-like peptide-1
agonist medication approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration with an indication for chronic weight management
in patients with an obesity diagnosis.
2. "Intensive health behavioral and lifestyle treatment"
means an evidence-based, intensive, multicomponent behavioral or
lifestyle modification intervention that supports healthy weight
management and is delivered in person or through telehealth as
defined in s. 456.47(1).
(e) On or before January 15, 2028, and annually
thereafter, the department shall report to the Governor, the
President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives on the participation level and cost savings to
both the enrollee and the state resulting from this subsection.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb977-00